Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 3. Records, Recordation and Indexing Generally.
§ 17.1-243.
Clerks to have land books bound.

Except those clerks using an automated system, clerks shall bind, in volumes of convenient size, all books in their respective clerks’ offices not currently bound showing the assessments of lands since the year 1850, and shall bind in like volumes such books hereafter filed in their clerks’ offices at intervals of not more than five years.

History.

Code 1919, § 5979, § 17-73; 1998, c. 872; 2014, c. 460.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 460 substituted “Except those clerks using an automated system, clerks” for “The circuit courts.”

§ 17.1-244.
Books, etc., in clerks’ offices rebound, transcribed, microfilmed or digitally reproduced; credit given to transcripts, etc.

Any court of record or, if so designated by the judge, the clerk thereof may cause any of the books or records in the clerk’s office which may be in need thereof to be rebound, transcribed, microfilmed or digitally reproduced. The same faith and credit shall be given to such transcript or reproductions from the microfilm or digitally reproduced record as the book or record transcribed would have been entitled to.

History.

Code 1919, § 5980, § 17-74; 1972, c. 549; 1976, c. 630; 1997, c. 836; 1998, c. 872; 2008, cc. 823, 833.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and inserted “or digitally reproduced record” in the second sentence.

§ 17.1-245.
Books may be taken from clerk’s office to be rebound, etc.

The court or, if so designated by the judge, the clerk directing any book or books to be bound, rebound, microfilmed or digitally reproduced may allow the same to be taken from the clerk’s office in which such book or books may be on file, but shall take all necessary and proper precautions, by requiring bonds or otherwise, to insure the preservation and return and to prevent the mutilation thereof.

History.

Code 1919, § 5981, § 17-75; 1976, c. 630; 1997, c. 836; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-246.
How costs thereof certified and paid.

The cost incurred shall be certified by the court or, if so designated by the judge, the clerk, to the governing body of the county or city in whose clerk’s office the books or records so bound, rebound, microfilmed, transcribed or digitally reproduced are on file, to be paid by such county or city.

History.

Code 1919, § 5982, § 17-76; 1976, c. 630; 1997, c. 836; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-247.
Repealed by Acts 2013, c. 263, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

17.1-247

, pertaining to when and how clerk to verify his record, derived from Code 1919, § 3401, § 17-77; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-248.
Clerk to make index to each of his books.

The clerk of every circuit court shall have an index to each book he is required to keep, except those for which general indexes are required or permitted, and kept, making convenient reference to every order, record or entry therein. Every execution and every judgment or decree for money shall be indexed, in the name of the person against whom and in the name of the person in whose favor the judgment or decree was rendered.

History.

Code 1919, § 3391, § 17-78; 1942, p. 179; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Recording Acts, § 13.

§ 17.1-249.
General indexes for clerks’ offices; daily index.

There shall be kept in every clerk’s office modern, family name or ledgerized alphabetical key-table general indexes to all deed books, miscellaneous liens, will books, judgment dockets and court order books. The clerk shall enter daily, either in such general indexes or in the daily index to instruments admitted to record, every deed, corrected or amended deed, deed of release, deed of trust, contract of sale, or any addendum, modification, or memorandum relating to any of these instruments, indexing each instrument in the names of all parties identified in the instrument as grantor, grantee, or both, as required by §

17.1-223

, or identified in the cover sheet as grantor, grantee, or both, pursuant to §

17.1-227.1

, as applicable.

A deed of trust made to one or more trustees to secure the payment of an indebtedness, and any certificate of satisfaction or certificate of partial satisfaction, assignment, loan modification agreement, substitution of trustees or similar instrument subsequently recorded with respect to such deed, shall be sufficiently indexed if the clerk enters in the appropriate places in the general index to deeds provided for in subsection A the names of the grantor and the name of the beneficiary or, in lieu of the name of the beneficiary, the first listed trustee as grantee. The beneficiary need not be named in the first clause of the deed as a condition of recordation.

A deed made by a person in a representative capacity, or by devisees or coparceners, shall be indexed in the names of the grantors and grantees and the name of the former record title owner listed in the first clause of the instrument.

The general indexes of civil causes shall be sufficiently kept if the clerk indexes such causes under the short style or title thereof, except that in multiple suits brought under §

58.1-3968

, the names of all of the defendants disclosed by the pleadings shall be entered in the general index or book.

Every deed of conveyance of real estate in which a vendor’s lien is reserved shall be indexed twice so as to show not only the conveyance from the grantor to the grantee in the instrument, but also the reservation of the lien as if it were a grant of such lien from the grantee to the grantor by a separate instrument and the fact of the lien shall be noted in the index.

At the time of qualification of an executor, every will shall be indexed in the name of the decedent and such executor.

All deed books, miscellaneous liens, will books, judgment dockets, and court order books shall be numbered or otherwise adequately designated and the clerk upon the delivery of any writing to him for record required by law to be recorded shall duly index it upon the general index in the manner hereinbefore required. When the writing has been actually transcribed on the book, the clerk shall add to the general index the number of the book in which, and the page on which, the writing is recorded.

The clerk on receipt of any such writing for record may immediately index it in a book to be known as the “daily index of instruments admitted to record” and within 90 days after its admission to record the clerk shall index all such writings indexed in the daily index in the appropriate general index as hereinbefore provided. The daily index book shall, at all times, be kept in the office of the clerk and conveniently available for examination by the public. During the period permitted for transfer from the daily index to the general index, indexing in the daily index shall be a sufficient compliance with the requirements of this section as to indexing.

The judge of any circuit court may make such orders as he deems advisable as to the time and method of indexing the order books in the clerk’s office of the court and may dispense with a general index for order books of the court.

The clerk may maintain his indexes on computer, word processor, microfilm, microfiche, or other micrographic medium and, in addition, may maintain his grantor and grantee indexes on paper.

History.

Code 1919, § 3394, § 17-79; 1920, p. 105; 1926, p. 125; 1936, p. 82; 1944, p. 355; 1952, c. 34; 1960, c. 146; 1974, c. 515; 1983, c. 293; 1990, c. 374; 1991, cc. 203, 204; 1998, c. 872; 2002, cc. 276, 832; 2005, c. 681; 2008, cc. 823, 833; 2014, c. 338; 2020, c. 1063.

Cross references.

For other provisions concerning docketing and indexing of judgments, see §§

8.01-446

through

8.01-452.1

.

For requirement that, on and after July 1, 1964, documents previously required to be recorded in the miscellaneous lien book be recorded in the deed book and indexed in the general index of deeds, see §

43-4.1

.

As to recordation of report of accounts, and debts and demands, by commissioner of accounts, see §

64.2-1214

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1063, cl. 2 provides: “That for any clerk of a circuit court that does not have an electronic program capable of indexing wills by the name of both the testator and the executor as of July 1, 2020, the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2022.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 276 inserted “and, in addition, may maintain his grantor and grantee indexes on paper” at the end of subsection I.

The 2002 amendment by c. 832 inserted “and any certificate of satisfaction . . . with respect to such deed” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, substituted “civil causes” for “law and chancery causes” in subsection D; and made a minor stylistic change in subsection G.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 823 and 833 are identical, and added “unless the instrument is submitted for recordation with a cover sheet pursuant to §

17.1-227.1

, in which case, the instrument may be indexed by the information contained in the cover sheet. The clerk shall comply with the provisions of §

17.1-223

” to the end of subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 338 rewrote subsection A; in subsection B inserted “of trust”; and in subsection E deleted “double” preceding “indexed,” inserted “twice,” and substituted “such lien” for “the same.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1063 inserted subsection F and redesignated accordingly. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article on the mechanics of an examination of title to real property in Virginia, see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 471 (1977).

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

For 1991 survey on property law, see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 859 (1991).

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Duty to record deed of trust. —

Clerk of court had a duty under §

17.1-249

to record a bank’s deed of trust correctly because the clerk was required to index consistently with the instrument itself, not the cover sheet, which contained erroneous information; nothing in §

17.1-227.1

repeals or otherwise modifies the clerk’s duty to properly index the recorded instrument, and the statute does exonerate the clerk for his failure to do so, notwithstanding an erroneous cover sheet. Mega Int'l Commerce Bank v. MCAP Capital, L.L.C., 74 Va. Cir. 132, 2007 Va. Cir. LEXIS 289 (Norfolk Sept. 6, 2007).

§ 17.1-250.
Correction of indexes.

No clerk or deputy clerk of any court in which deeds are recorded shall correct any indexing mistake by insertion, or alter or reprint the page, unless, at the time of such insertion, alteration or reprinting, he (i) notes the date and nature of the change in the index or (ii) by any other means capable of maintaining a permanent record of the change together with the original recording, indicates the date and nature of the change and the name of the person who made it.

History.

1966, c. 403, § 17-79.1; 1991, c. 652; 1998, c. 872; 2014, c. 330.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 330 in clause (i) deleted “margin of the” following “change in the” and “and places his name or initials upon same” following “index.”

§ 17.1-251.
Indexing of certain subdivision plats or maps.

When any plat or map of a subdivision which contains fifteen lots or more is recorded in the general index, the clerk shall, in addition to complying with the requirements set forth in §

17.1-249

, add the magisterial district wherein the subdivision is located. Such plat or map shall also show the source of title of the immediate grantor.

History.

1974, c. 349, § 17-79.2; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-252.
Indexing by tax map reference number.

Circuit court clerks in those localities with a unique parcel identification system shall require that any deed or other instrument conveying or relating to an interest in real property bear, on the first page of the deed or other instrument, or state in the cover sheet submitted with the deed or other instrument, the tax map reference number or numbers, or the parcel identification number (PIN) or numbers, of the affected parcel or parcels. Upon admitting the deed or other instrument to record, the clerk may, in addition to any other indexing required by law, index the deed or other instrument by the tax map reference number or numbers or by the parcel identification number or numbers.

History.

1982, c. 597, § 17-79.3; 1986, c. 21; 1988, c. 116; 1992, c. 478; 1996, c. 231; 1997, cc. 224, 902; 1998, cc. 75, 872; 1999, cc. 133, 163; 2000, cc. 440, 446; 2014, c. 338.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 133 and 163 are identical, and substituted “Circuit court clerks” for “The Clerks of the Circuit Courts of Arlington, Augusta, Chesterfield, Fairfax, Fauquier, Henrico, Loudoun, Montgomery, Prince William, Roanoke, Rockingham, Spotsylvania and Wise Counties and the Cities of Alexandria, Fairfax, Falls Church, Norton, Richmond, Roanoke, and Virginia Beach” in the first sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 440 and 446 are identical, and in the first sentence, substituted “in those localities with a unique parcel identification system shall” for “may”, and substituted “on” for “in the left margin of.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 338 inserted “or state in the cover sheet submitted with the deed or other instrument” in the first sentence.

§ 17.1-253.
Committee to inquire into necessity of general index; report; plan adopted; locality to cover cost.

Whenever the circuit court, or the judge thereof, finds that there is need of an improved system of general indexing to any of the records kept by the clerk of court, it shall be the duty of the court or judge, in its or his discretion, to appoint a committee to inquire into the necessity for such indexing, and make a report to the court, or the judge thereof.

If the committee reports that the work is needed, the court or judge shall authorize and direct the committee to make a written contract with some responsible and experienced person or persons, but such contract shall be approved by the court or judge before it becomes effective.

When such index is installed in any clerk’s office the same plan of index to current records shall be adopted and used by the clerk of such court.

The governing body of the county or city wherein such indexing shall be directed by the court or judge to be done shall, if necessary, provide a sufficient sum to pay for such indexing and materials.

History.

Code 1919, §§ 3395, 3396, 3397, 3398, §§ 17-80, 17-81, 17-82, 17-83; 1948, p. 62; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-254.
Validation of judgment records in office of clerk of Circuit Court of Norfolk.

The “General Index to Judgment Lien Docket and Execution Books” designated “A-D,” “E-K,” “L-R” and “S-Z,” respectively, in the office of the clerk of the Circuit Court of the City of Norfolk is hereby validated, and is and shall be for all purposes whatever the legal record of judgments docketed as provided by law in the office of such clerk for the period beginning January 2, 1917.

History.

1948, p. 59, § 17-83.1; 1998, c. 872.